incubator/apertium-nn-nb.nn.dix
    <pardef n="sut/ter__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ra</l>
          <r>ter<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ret</l>
          <r>ter<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ri</l>
          <r>ter<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tera</l>
          <r>ter<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>teret</l>
          <r>ter<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>teri</l>
          <r>ter<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ter</l>
          <r>ter<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ter</l>
          <r>ter<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="yng/el__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>elen</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>el</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lane</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lar</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="vå/e__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ane</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="tørkerom__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ma</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>met</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mi</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ving/el__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>elen</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>elet</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>el</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>el</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>el</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lane</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>la</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lar</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>let</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>li</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="stabelhengs/el__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>elet</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>el</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>el</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>el</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>la</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>la</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lene</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ler</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>let</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>li</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>li</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="sogb/arn__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arna</l>
          <r>arn<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arnet</l>
          <r>arn<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arni</l>
          <r>arn<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arn</l>
          <r>arn<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arn</l>
          <r>arn<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orna</l>
          <r>arn<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orni</l>
          <r>arn<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orn</l>
          <r>arn<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="tig/er__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eren</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rane</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rar</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="tennstempel"><i>tennstemp</i><par n="ving/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="spegel"><i>speg</i><par n="yng/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vernepliktsalder"><i>vernepliktsald</i><par n="tig/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="snyrel"><i>snyr</i><par n="yng/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tvistade"><i>tvistad</i><par n="vå/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vidvinkel"><i>vidvink</i><par n="yng/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tiger"><i>tig</i><par n="tig/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="spatel"><i>spat</i><par n="yng/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="trompetblome"><i>trompetblom</i><par n="vå/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="snitsel"><i>snits</i><par n="yng/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sugebarn"><i>sugeb</i><par n="sogb/arn__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tuktemeister"><i>tuktemeist</i><par n="tig/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tørkerom"><i>tørkerom</i><par n="tørkerom__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tuberkelbakterie"><i>tuberkelbakteri</i><par n="vå/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="wienersnitsel"><i>wienersnits</i><par n="yng/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="thalidomidbarn"><i>thalidomidb</i><par n="sogb/arn__n"/></e>
    <e lm="talgkjertel"><i>talgkjert</i><par n="yng/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="speletime"><i>speletim</i><par n="vå/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tekjebarn"><i>tekjeb</i><par n="sogb/arn__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stabelhengsel"><i>stabelhengs</i><par n="stabelhengs/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="våpenmangel"><i>våpenmang</i><par n="yng/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tøffelblomster"><i>tøffelblomst</i><par n="tig/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tippoldebarn"><i>tippoldeb</i><par n="sogb/arn__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tilbakebetalingsmetode"><i>tilbakebetalingsmetod</i><par n="vå/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="statsminister"><i>statsminist</i><par n="tig/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ulukkesbarn"><i>ulukkesb</i><par n="sogb/arn__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tidlegvokster"><i>tidlegvokst</i><par n="tig/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="utfyllingssetel"><i>utfyllingsset</i><par n="yng/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="uklare"><i>uklar</i><par n="vå/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="verpealder"><i>verpeald</i><par n="tig/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="usiger"><i>usig</i><par n="tig/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="trave"><i>trav</i><par n="vå/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="verdsbarn"><i>verdsb</i><par n="sogb/arn__n"/></e>
    <e lm="strømvirvel"><i>strømvirv</i><par n="yng/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="voggebarn"><i>voggeb</i><par n="sogb/arn__n"/></e>
    <e lm="verksmeister"><i>verksmeist</i><par n="tig/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="triangel"><i>triang</i><par n="ving/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="straffemåte"><i>straffemåt</i><par n="vå/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="underbarn"><i>underb</i><par n="sogb/arn__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tannhøvel"><i>tannhøv</i><par n="yng/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vegmeister"><i>vegmeist</i><par n="tig/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vargunge"><i>vargung</i><par n="vå/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sogbarn"><i>sogb</i><par n="sogb/arn__n"/></e>
    <e lm="svade"><i>svad</i><par n="vå/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vertikalsirkel"><i>vertikalsirk</i><par n="yng/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sputer"><i>sput</i><par n="tig/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ulykkesbarn"><i>ulykkesb</i><par n="sogb/arn__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sutter"><i>sut</i><par n="sut/ter__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vindaugshengsel"><i>vindaugshengs</i><par n="stabelhengs/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="veterinærhøgskole"><i>veterinærhøgskol</i><par n="vå/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="verbarn"><i>verb</i><par n="sogb/arn__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ullhespel"><i>ullhesp</i><par n="yng/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stasjonsmeister"><i>stasjonsmeist</i><par n="tig/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="søskenbarn"><i>søskenb</i><par n="sogb/arn__n"/></e>
    <e lm="turkeperiode"><i>turkeperiod</i><par n="vå/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stempel"><i>stemp</i><par n="ving/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tordivel"><i>tordiv</i><par n="yng/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="solskinsbarn"><i>solskinsb</i><par n="sogb/arn__n"/></e>
    <e lm="trefiber"><i>trefib</i><par n="tig/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="storfamilie"><i>storfamili</i><par n="vå/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vingel"><i>ving</i><par n="ving/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tekstilfiber"><i>tekstilfib</i><par n="tig/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vedvendel"><i>vedvend</i><par n="yng/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vegmasse"><i>vegmass</i><par n="vå/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="soknebarn"><i>sokneb</i><par n="sogb/arn__n"/></e>
    <e lm="turkerom"><i>turkerom</i><par n="tørkerom__n"/></e>
